District of Columbia statutes.
4-753.06

Department requirements for placements of individuals and families in permanent supportive housing.

(a)

All permanent supportive housing placements funded exclusively with non-federal funds shall be filled by appropriate homeless individuals or families as identified by the Department.

(b)

Each permanent supportive housing placement shall be filled no later than 60 days after the day funding for the placement becomes available.

(c)

The Department shall review all assessments of individuals and families to identify which individual or family is appropriate to fill the available placement.

History

Oct. 22, 2005, D,C, Law 16-35, § 8d
as added July 23, 2014, D.C. Law 20-129, § 2, 61 DCR 5726

Effect of Amendments

The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-129 added this section.